Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 329.711 is amended to read:
329.711. (1) Nothing in this  section shall interfere with the duties, responsibilities and rights of
duly elected  school district boards. There shall be established at each school district an educational
equity advisory committee.
(2)(a) The duties of an educational equity advisory committee shall include:
[(a) Advising the school district board about the educational equity impacts of policy decisions; ]
[(b)] (A) Advising the school district superintendent about the educational equity impacts of
policy decisions; and
[(c)] (B) Informing the [ school district board and ] school district superintendent  when a situation
arises in a school  of the school district that negatively impacts underrepresented students and ad-
vising the [ board and ] superintendent on how best to handle that situation.
(b) The school district superintendent may act on any  recommendations of the educa-
tional equity advisory committee without approval from the school district board.
(3) The educational equity advisory committee may prepare an annual report that:
(a) Contains the following information:
(A) The  successes and challenges the school district has experienced in meeting the educational
equity needs of students in the school district;
(B) Recommendations the committee made to the [ school district board and ] school district su-
perintendent, and the actions that were taken in response to those recommendations; and
(C) Any other information required by the State Board of Education by rule.
(b) Is shared with the school district board:
(A) By the school district superintendent; and
(B) If requested by the school district board, by  the committee as a presentation by the
committee at a school district board meeting.
[(b)] (c) Is made available by being:
(A) Distributed to the parents of the students of the school district;
(B) Posted on the school district’s website;  and
[(C) Presented to the school district board in an open meeting with adequate opportunity for public
comment; and]
[(D)] (C) Sent to the State Board of Education.
Enrolled House Bill 2453 (HB 2453-A) Page 1
(4)(a) An educational equity advisory committee shall be selected by the [ school district board
and] school district superintendent and must be composed of parents, employees,  students and com-
munity members from the school district.
(b) For the purpose of selecting members, the [ school district board and ] school  district super-
intendent:
(A) Shall solicit names of possible members from the community;
(B) Must ensure that membership is primarily representative of underserved student groups;
(C) May not exclude members based on immigration status; and
(D) Must comply with any other  requirements established by the State Board of Education by
rule.
(5) The State Board  of Education shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of this
section.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2453 (HB 2453-A) Page 2